kk_test.aff
LANG kk_test
SET UTF-8
TRY әіңғүұқөһоаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁӘІҢҒҮҰҚӨҺ
FLAG long
# First letter of flag denotes part of speech:
# N is for nouns
# A is for adjectives

AF 4
AF NANBNbNCNcNDNdNENeNFNfNGNHNINJNKNLNmNNNONPNRNQNSNTNUNVNWNY # 1 - Usual noun: plural, posessives, cases
AF NGNHNINJNKNLNmNQNTNUNVNWNY # 2 - Plural forms and posessives of noun plus cases
AF NGNINJNKNLNMNQNTNUNVNWNY # 3 - Plural forms and posessives of noun plus cases for 1st sing
AF AAAB # 4 - Comparative and diminutive forms for adjectives

AM 33
AM +pl. # NA
AM +1st sing. poss. # NB
AM +pl. +1st sing. poss. # Nb
AM +1st pl. poss./++1st pl. pers. # NC
AM +pl. +1st pl. poss./++1st pl. pers. # Nc
AM +2nd sing. poss. # ND
AM +pl. +2nd sing. poss. # Nd
AM +2nd pl. poss. # NE
AM +pl. +2nd pl. poss. # Ne
AM +3rd poss. # NF
AM +pl. + 3rd poss. # Nf
AM +Gen. # NG
AM +Dat. # NH
AM +Acc. # NI
AM +Loc. # NJ
AM +Loc. +Adj. # NJ
AM +Abl. # NK
AM +Inst. # NL
AM Merge(+1st sing.+Dat.) # NM, Nm
AM Merge(+2nd sing.+Dat.) # NN
AM Merge(+3rd sing.+Dat.) # NO
AM Merge(+3rd sing.+Acc.) # NP
AM Merge(+3rd sing.+Loc.) # NR
AM Merge(+3rd sing.+Loc.) +Adj. # NR
AM +Possesive 2nd form # NQ
AM +1st sing. pers. # NR
AM +1st plur. pers. # NT
AM +2nd impol. sing. pers. # NU
AM +2nd impol. plur. pers. # NV
AM +2nd pol. sing. pers. # NW
AM +2nd pol. plur. pers. # NY
AM +comp. # AA
AM +comp./+dimin. # AB

### NOUNS ###

# Plural rules for nouns
SFX NA Y 8
SFX NA 0 дар/2 [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 1
SFX NA 0 дер/2 [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 1
SFX NA 0 лар/2 [аоуұыэ] 1
SFX NA 0 лар/2 [аоуұыэ][йрую] 1
SFX NA 0 лер/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 1
SFX NA 0 лер/2 [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 1
SFX NA 0 тар/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 1
SFX NA 0 тер/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 1

# Posessive rules for nouns - singular and plural
SFX NB Y 12
SFX NB 0 ім/3 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйлмнһрстуфхцчшщ] 2
SFX NB 0 ім/3 [әеёиөүія]ю 2
SFX NB 0 ім/3 и 2
SFX NB 0 м/3 [аоұыэәеёөүіюя] 2
SFX NB 0 ым/3 [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйлмнһрстуфхцчшщ] 2
SFX NB 0 ым/3 [ую] 2
SFX NB к гім/3 [әеёиөүіюя]к 2
SFX NB қ ғім/3 [әеёиөүіюя]қ 2
SFX NB к гым/3 [аоуұыэ]к 2
SFX NB қ ғым/3 [аоуұыэ]қ 2
SFX NB п бім/3 [әеёиөүіюя]п 2
SFX NB п бым/3 [аоуұыэ]п 2
SFX Nb Y 8
SFX Nb 0 дарым/3 [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 3
SFX Nb 0 дерім/3 [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 3
SFX Nb 0 ларым/3 [аоуұыэ] 3
SFX Nb 0 ларым/3 [аоуұыэ][йрую] 3
SFX Nb 0 лерім/3 [әеёиөүіюя] 3
SFX Nb 0 лерім/3 [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 3
SFX Nb 0 тарым/3 [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 3
SFX Nb 0 терім/3 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 3
SFX NC Y 5
SFX NC 0 іміз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстуфхцчшщ] 4
SFX NC 0 міз/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 4
SFX NC 0 мыз/2 [аоұыэ] 4
SFX NC 0 ымыз/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 4
SFX NC 0 ымыз/2 у 4
SFX Nc Y 8
SFX Nc 0 дарымыз/2 [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 5
SFX Nc 0 деріміз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 5
SFX Nc 0 ларымыз/2 [аоуұыэ] 5
SFX Nc 0 ларымыз/2 [аоуұыэ][йрую] 5
SFX Nc 0 леріміз/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 5
SFX Nc 0 леріміз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 5
SFX Nc 0 тарымыз/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 5
SFX Nc 0 теріміз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 5
SFX ND Y 4
SFX ND 0 ің/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстуфхцчшщ] 6
SFX ND 0 ң/2 [аоұыэәеёиөүіюя] 6
SFX ND 0 ың/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 6
SFX ND 0 ың/2 у 6
SFX Nd Y 8
SFX Nd 0 дарың/2 [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 7
SFX Nd 0 дерің/2 [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 7
SFX Nd 0 ларың/2 [аоуұыэ] 7
SFX Nd 0 ларың/2 [аоуұыэ][йрую] 7
SFX Nd 0 лерің/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 7
SFX Nd 0 лерің/2 [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 7
SFX Nd 0 тарың/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 7
SFX Nd 0 терің/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 7
SFX NE Y 5
SFX NE 0 іңіз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстуфхцчшщ] 8
SFX NE 0 ңіз/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 8
SFX NE 0 ңыз/2 [аоұыэ] 8
SFX NE 0 ыңыз/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 8
SFX NE 0 ыңыз/2 у 8
SFX Ne Y 8
SFX Ne 0 дарыңыз/2 [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 9
SFX Ne 0 деріңіз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 9
SFX Ne 0 ларыңыз/2 [аоуұыэ] 9
SFX Ne 0 ларыңыз/2 [аоуұыэ][йрую] 9
SFX Ne 0 леріңіз/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 9
SFX Ne 0 леріңіз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 9
SFX Ne 0 тарыңыз/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 9
SFX Ne 0 теріңіз/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 9
SFX NF Y 5
SFX NF 0 і/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 10
SFX NF 0 сі/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 10
SFX NF 0 сы/2 [аоұыэ] 10
SFX NF 0 ы/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 10
SFX NF 0 ы/2 у 10
SFX Nf Y 8
SFX Nf 0 дары/2 [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 11
SFX Nf 0 дері/2 [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 11
SFX Nf 0 лары/2 [аоуұыэ] 11
SFX Nf 0 лары/2 [аоуұыэ][йрую] 11
SFX Nf 0 лері/2 [әеёиөүіюя] 11
SFX Nf 0 лері/2 [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 11
SFX Nf 0 тары/2 [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 11
SFX Nf 0 тері/2 [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 11

# Cases for nouns
SFX NG Y 8
SFX NG 0 дің [әеёиөүіюя][жзйлру] 12
SFX NG 0 дың [аоуұыэ][жзйлру] 12
SFX NG 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя] 12
SFX NG 0 нің [әеёиөүіюя][нңм] 12
SFX NG 0 ның [аоуұыэ] 12
SFX NG 0 ның [аоуұыэ][нңм] 12
SFX NG 0 тің [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 12
SFX NG 0 тың [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 12
SFX NH Y 6
SFX NH 0 ға [аоуұыэ] 13
SFX NH 0 ға [аоуұыэ][жзйлмнңру] 13
SFX NH 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя] 13
SFX NH 0 ге [әеёиөүіюя][жзйлмнңру] 13
SFX NH 0 қа [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 13
SFX NH 0 ке [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 13
SFX NI Y 6
SFX NI 0 ді [әеёиөүіюя][жзйлмнңру] 14
SFX NI 0 ды [аоуұыэ][жзйлмнңру] 14
SFX NI 0 ні [әеёиөүіюя] 14
SFX NI 0 ны [аоуұыэ] 14
SFX NI 0 ті [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 14
SFX NI 0 ты [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 14
SFX NJ Y 16
SFX NJ 0 да [аоуұыэ][жзйлмнң] 15
SFX NJ 0 дағы [аоуұыэ][жзйлмнң] 16
SFX NJ 0 де [әеёиөүіюя][жзйлмнң] 15
SFX NJ 0 дегі [әеёиөүіюя][жзйлмнң] 16
SFX NJ 0 да [аоуұыэ] 15
SFX NJ 0 дағы [аоуұыэ] 16
SFX NJ 0 да [аоуұыэ][йру] 15
SFX NJ 0 дағы [аоуұыэ][йру] 16
SFX NJ 0 де [әеёиөүіюя] 15
SFX NJ 0 дегі [әеёиөүіюя] 16
SFX NJ 0 де [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 15
SFX NJ 0 дегі [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 16
SFX NJ 0 та [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 15
SFX NJ 0 тағы [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 16
SFX NJ 0 те [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 15
SFX NJ 0 тегі [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 16
SFX NK Y 8
SFX NK 0 дан [аоуұыэ] 17
SFX NK 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя] 17
SFX NK 0 дан [аоуұыэ][жзйлру] 17
SFX NK 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя][жзйлру] 17
SFX NK 0 тан [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 17
SFX NK 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 17
SFX NK 0 нан [аоуұыэ][мнң] 17
SFX NK 0 нен [әеёиөүіюя][мнң] 17
SFX NL Y 6
SFX NL 0 бен [жз] 18
SFX NL 0 бенен [жз] 18
SFX NL 0 мен [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюяйлмнңру] 18
SFX NL 0 менен [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюяйлмнңру] 18
SFX NL 0 пен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] 18
SFX NL 0 пенен [бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] 18

# Special cases for combinations of certain case and certain possessions
# First person singular and Dative for plural form of nouns
SFX NM Y 2
SFX NM м іме [әеёиөүіюя]м 19
SFX NM м ыма [аоуұыэ]м 19
# First person singular and Dative for singular form of nouns
SFX Nm Y 13
SFX Nm 0 іме [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйлмнһрстуфхцчшщ] 19
SFX Nm 0 іме [әеёиөүія]ю 19
SFX Nm 0 іме и  19
SFX Nm 0 ма [аоуұыэ] 19
SFX Nm 0 ме [әеёиөүіюя] 19
SFX Nm 0 ыма [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйлмнһрстуфхцчшщ] 19
SFX Nm 0 ыма [ую] 19
SFX Nm к гіме [әеёиөүіюя]к 19
SFX Nm қ ғіме [әеёиөүіюя]қ 19
SFX Nm к гыма [аоуұыэ]к 19
SFX Nm қ ғыма [аоуұыэ]қ 19
SFX Nm п біме [әеёиөүіюя]п 19
SFX Nm п быма [аоуұыэ]п 19
# Second person singular and Dative
SFX NN Y 5
SFX NN 0 іңе [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстуфхцчшщ] 20
SFX NN 0 ңе [әеёиөүіюя] 20
SFX NN 0 ңа [аоуұыэ] 20
SFX NN 0 ыңа [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 20
SFX NN 0 ыңа у 20
# Third person and Dative
SFX NO Y 5
SFX NO 0 іне [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 21
SFX NO 0 сіне [әеёиөүіюя] 21
SFX NO 0 сына [аоұыэ] 21
SFX NO 0 ына [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 21
SFX NO 0 ына у 21
# Third person and Accusative
SFX NP Y 5
SFX NP 0 ін [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 22
SFX NP 0 сін [әеёиөүіюя] 22
SFX NP 0 сын [аоұыэ] 22
SFX NP 0 ын [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 22
SFX NP 0 ын у 22
# Third person and Locative
SFX NR Y 10
SFX NR 0 інде [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 23
SFX NR 0 індегі [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 24
SFX NR 0 сінде [әеёиөүіюя] 23
SFX NR 0 сіндегі [әеёиөүіюя] 24
SFX NR 0 сында [аоұыэ] 23
SFX NR 0 сындағы [аоұыэ] 24
SFX NR 0 ында [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 23
SFX NR 0 ындағы [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 24
SFX NR 0 ында у 23
SFX NR 0 ындағы у 24

# Posessive 2nd form for nouns
SFX NQ Y 4
SFX NQ 0 нікі [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя] 25
SFX NQ 0 нікі [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя][жйлу] 25
SFX NQ 0 тікі [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 25
SFX NQ 0 дікі [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя][нңрзм] 25

# Personal forms for nouns
SFX NS Y 8
SFX NS 0 бын [аоұыэ][жз] 26
SFX NS 0 бін [әеёиөүіюя][жз] 26
SFX NS 0 мін [әеёиөүіюя][йлмнңру] 26
SFX NS 0 мын [аоұыэ][йлмнңру] 26
SFX NS 0 мін [әеёиөүіюя] 26
SFX NS 0 мын [аоұыэу] 26
SFX NS 0 пін [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] 26
SFX NS 0 пын [аоұыэ][бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] 26
SFX NT Y 8
SFX NT 0 быз [аоұыэ][жзнң] 27
SFX NT 0 біз [әеёиөүіюя][жзнң] 27
SFX NT 0 міз [әеёиөүіюя] 27
SFX NT 0 мыз [аоұыэу] 27
SFX NT 0 міз [әеёиөүіюя][йлмру] 27
SFX NT 0 мыз [аоұыэ][йлмру] 27
SFX NT 0 піз [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] 27
SFX NT 0 пыз [аоұыэ][бвгғдкқпстфхһцчшщ] 27
SFX NU Y 4
SFX NU 0 сің [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 28
SFX NU 0 сің [әеёиөүіюя] 28
SFX NU 0 сың [аоуұыэ] 28
SFX NU 0 сың [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 28
SFX NV Y 4
SFX NV 0 сіңдер [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 29
SFX NV 0 сіңдер [әеёиөүіюя] 29
SFX NV 0 сыңдар [аоуұыэ] 29
SFX NV 0 сыңдар [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 29
SFX NW Y 4
SFX NW 0 сіз [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 30
SFX NW 0 сіз [әеёиөүіюя] 30
SFX NW 0 сыз [аоуұыэ] 30
SFX NW 0 сыз [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 30
SFX NY Y 4
SFX NY 0 сіздер [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 31
SFX NY 0 сіздер [әеёиөүіюя] 31
SFX NY 0 сыздар [аоуұыэ] 31
SFX NY 0 сыздар [аоуұыэ][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 31

### ADJECTIVES ###

SFX AA N 4
SFX AA 0 рек [әеёиөүіюя] 32
SFX AA 0 ірек [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 32
SFX AA 0 рақ [аоуұыэ] 32
SFX AA 0 ырақ [аоуұыэ][бвғджзйкқлмнңһпрстфхцчшщ] 32
SFX AB N 8
SFX AB 0 дау [аоуұыэ][жзлмнң] 33
SFX AB 0 деу [әеёиөүіюя][жзлмнң] 33
SFX AB 0 лау [аоуұыэ] 33
SFX AB 0 лау [аоуұыэ][йрую] 33
SFX AB 0 леу [әеёиөүіюя] 33
SFX AB 0 леу [әеёиөүіюя][йру] 33
SFX AB 0 тау [аоуұыэ][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 33
SFX AB 0 теу [әеёиөүіюя][бвгғдкқһпстфхцчшщ] 33
